Washington statutes.
RCW 19.144.005

Findings—2008 c 108.

The legislature finds that responsible mortgage lending and homeownership are important to the citizens of the state of Washington. The legislature declares that protecting our residents and our economy from the threat of widespread foreclosures and providing homeowners with access to residential mortgage loans on fair and equitable terms is in the public interest. The legislature further finds that chapter 108, Laws of 2008 is necessary to encourage responsible lending, protect borrowers, and preserve access to credit in the residential real estate lending market.

[ 2008 c 108 s 1.]